Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.090

Hearings—Rules of procedure—Counsel.

(1) Procedures for the conduct of all hearings provided in this chapter may be established by rule of the supreme court.

(2) Any person subject to proceedings under this chapter may be represented by counsel.

(3) The attorney representing the state, county, city, town, or transit agency authorized to issue civil infractions may appear in any proceedings under this chapter but need not appear, notwithstanding any statute or rule of court to the contrary.

[ 2009 c 279 s 1; 1987 c 456 s 17.]